Hawaii, session 2026, SB3215.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Act 236, Session Laws of Hawaii 2024 (Act 236), established requirements for mooring operations to increase harbor safety, protect the physical integrity of the State's commercial harbor system, and ensure the continuous flow of critical food supplies.  The legislature further finds that the requirements established by Act 236 are subject to a sunset provision and are scheduled to be repealed on July 1, 2028. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to ensure long-term operational certainty and harbor security by repealing the sunset provisions of Act 236 without amending any substantive requirements of that Act or any provision of chapter 266, Hawaii Revised Statutes. SECTION 2. Act 236, Session Laws of Hawaii 2024, is amended by amending section 5 to read as follows: "SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval[; provided that this Act shall be repealed on July 1, 2028]." SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________